Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-431
Records; filing; fees of county clerk.

The originals of all contracts of every kind in writing, made by or with the board of directors or officers, with reference to the construction or use of such public work, or the rights or obligations of the drainage district therein, shall be filed and recorded with the county clerk, who shall receive for all services the fees allowed by law for similar services.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 25, p. 484;

R.S.1913, § 1895;

C.S.1922, § 1843;

C.S.1929, § 31-531;

R.S.1943, § 31-431.